Tennessee, session 114, SB1011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(g) It is an exception to the application of subsection (b) that the person who
performed or attempted to perform the abortion was a licensed physician and the
patient's pregnancy was the result of aggravated rape, as defined in § 39-13-502; rape,
as defined in § 39-13-503; rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-522; especially
aggravated rape, as defined in § 39-13-534; especially aggravated rape of a child, as
defined in § 39-13-535; or incest, as defined in § 39-15-302.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1011
001096
- 1 -